North Carolina, session 2025, HB491.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

MEDICAID REBASE FUNDING
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the limitations under G.S. 143C-4-11 on the use,
allocation, and expenditure of funds reserved in the Medicaid Contingency Reserve, there is
appropriated from the Medicaid Contingency Reserve to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of one hundred ninety million dollars
($190,000,000) in nonrecurring funds and associated receipts for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be
used to adjust Medicaid funding to account for projected changes in enrollment, enrollment mix,
service and capitation costs, and federal match rates, as well as the implementation of the
Children and Families Specialty Plan in December 2025.

LME/MCO INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFERS
SECTION 2.(a) The local management entities/managed care organizations
(LME/MCOs) shall make intergovernmental transfers to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), in an aggregate amount of eighteen million
twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen dollars ($18,028,217) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year
and in an aggregate amount of eighteen million twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen
dollars ($18,028,217) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The due date and frequency of the
intergovernmental transfer required by this section shall be determined by DHB. The amount of
the intergovernmental transfer that each individual LME/MCO is required to make in each fiscal
year shall be as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Alliance Behavioral Healthcare $4,508,857 $4,508,857
Partners Health Management $3,544,348 $3,544,348
Trillium Health Resources $6,448,693 $6,448,693
Vaya Health $3,526,319 $3,526,319
SECTION 2.(b) In the event that a county disengages from an LME/MCO and
realigns with another LME/MCO during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, DHB shall have the
authority to reallocate the amount of the intergovernmental transfer that each affected
LME/MCO is required to make under subsection (a) of this section, taking into consideration the
change in catchment area and covered population, provided that the aggregate amount of the
transfers received from all LME/MCOs in each year of the fiscal biennium is achieved.

*H491-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective retroactively to July
1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 491-Second Edition